Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 19.2 Sentencing to Life Imprisonment Without Parole

12-19.2-1.
Sentencing procedures — Trial by jury.

In all cases tried by a jury in which the penalty of life imprisonment without parole may be imposed pursuant to §

11-23-2

or

11-23-2.1

, and in which the attorney general has recommended to the court in writing within twenty (20) days of the date of the arraignment that such a sentence be imposed, the court shall, upon return of a verdict of guilty of murder in the first degree by the jury, instruct the jury to determine whether it has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the murder committed by the defendant involved one of the circumstances enumerated in §

11-23-2

or

11-23-2.1

as the basis for imposition of a sentence of life imprisonment without parole. If after deliberation the jury finds that one or more of the enumerated circumstances was present, it shall state in writing, signed by the foreperson of the jury, which circumstance or circumstances it found beyond a reasonable doubt. Upon return of an affirmative verdict, the court shall conduct a presentence hearing. At the hearing, the court shall permit the attorney general and the defense to present additional evidence relevant to a determination of the sentence to be imposed as provided for in §

12-19.2-4

. After hearing evidence and argument relating to the presence or absence of aggravating and mitigating factors, the court shall, in its discretion, sentence the defendant to either life imprisonment without parole or life imprisonment. If the trial court is reversed on appeal because of error only in the presentence hearing, the new proceedings before the trial court which may be ordered shall pertain only to the issue of sentencing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 362, § 2.

12-19.2-2.
Sentencing procedures — Trial by judge sitting without a jury.

In all cases tried by a judge sitting without a jury in which the penalty of life imprisonment without parole may be imposed pursuant to §

11-23-2

or

11-23-2.1

, and in which the attorney general has recommended to the court in writing within twenty (20) days of the date of the arraignment that such a sentence be imposed, the court shall, if the court finds the defendant guilty of murder in the first degree, also render a finding as to whether it has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the murder committed by the defendant involved one of the circumstances enumerated in §

11-23-2

or

11-23-2.1

as the basis for imposition of a sentence of life imprisonment without parole. If the court finds that one or more of the enumerated circumstances was present, it shall state on the record which circumstance or circumstances it found beyond a reasonable doubt. Upon an affirmative finding by the court, it shall conduct a presentence hearing. At the hearing, the court shall permit the attorney general and the defense to present additional evidence relevant to a determination of the sentence to be imposed as provided for in §

12-19.2-4

. After hearing evidence and argument relating to the presence or absence of aggravating and mitigating factors, the court shall, in its discretion, sentence the defendant to either life imprisonment without parole or life imprisonment. If the trial court is reversed on appeal because of error only in the presentence hearing, the new proceedings before the trial court which may be ordered shall pertain only to the issue of sentencing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 362, § 2.

12-19.2-3.
Sentencing procedures — Plea of guilty.

In all cases in which the defendant pleads guilty or nolo contendere to an offense for which the penalty of life imprisonment without parole may be imposed pursuant to §

11-23-2

or

11-23-2.1

, and in which the attorney general has recommended to the court in writing within twenty (20) days of the date of the arraignment that such a sentence be imposed, the court shall conduct a presentence hearing. At the hearing, the court shall permit the attorney general and the defense to present additional evidence relevant to a determination of the sentence to be imposed as provided for in §

12-19.2-4

. After hearing evidence and argument relating to the presence or absence of aggravating and mitigating factors, the court shall, in its discretion, sentence the defendant to either life imprisonment without parole or life imprisonment. If the trial court is reversed on appeal because of error only in the presentence hearing, the new proceedings before the trial court which may be ordered shall pertain only to the issue of sentencing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 362, § 2.

12-19.2-4.
Consideration of aggravating and mitigating circumstances.

At the presentence hearing, following a finding that one or more of the circumstances enumerated in §

11-23-2

or

11-23-2.1

as the basis for imposition of a sentence of life imprisonment without parole was involved in the first degree murder of which the defendant has been convicted, the court shall consider evidence regarding the nature and circumstances of the offense and the personal history, character, record, and propensities of the defendant which are relevant to the sentencing determination. After hearing evidence and argument regarding the aggravating and mitigating circumstances relating to the offense and the defendant, the court shall, in its discretion, sentence the defendant to life imprisonment without parole or to life imprisonment. The court shall state on the record its reasons for imposing its sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 362, § 2.

12-19.2-5.
Review of life sentence without parole.

The defendant shall have the right to appeal a sentence of life imprisonment without parole to the supreme court of the state in accordance with the applicable rules of court. In considering an appeal of a sentence, the court, after review of the transcript of the proceedings below, may, in its discretion, ratify the imposition of the sentence of life imprisonment without parole or may reduce the sentence to life imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 362, § 2.

12-19.2-6.
Work release and furlough programs — Prohibited.

A person serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole shall not be eligible for participation in the work release program as set forth in §

42-56-21

, the furlough program as set forth in §

42-56-18

, or any other program which allows a prisoner to be released from the confinement of the prison facility to which the prisoner has been assigned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 362, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 16.